Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1828XS (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. 120 Section 1. Section 139A.35, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 139A.35 Minors. 3 A With the exception of the provision of a vaccination for a 4 sexually transmitted disease or infection, a minor shall have 5 the legal capacity to act and give consent to the provision 6 of medical care or services to the minor for the prevention, 7 diagnosis, or treatment of a sexually transmitted disease or 8 infection by a hospital, clinic, or health care provider. 9 Such medical care or services shall be provided by or under 10 the supervision of a physician licensed to practice medicine 11 and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, a physician 12 assistant, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner. 13 Consent shall not be subject to later disaffirmance by reason 14 of such minority. The consent of another person, including but 15 not limited to the consent of a spouse, parent, custodian, or 16 guardian, shall not be necessary. 17